fst/lexc/git_clitics.txt
Multichar_Symbols
=PN
=CN
=PROX
=PR.EV
=YNQ
=QUDD
=EPIS
=REPORT
=RESEM

LEXICON Word
	SecPosClitic ;
@D.CAT.AUX@	PhraseClitic ;
@D.CAT.AUX@	SentFinalClitic ;

LEXICON PhraseClitic
=PROX:^si 	NextNClitic ;
=PROX:^sa 	NextNClitic ;
=PR.EV:^gi 	NextNClitic ;
		 	NextNClitic ;

LEXICON Resemb
=RESEM:^ii 	CNClitic ;

LEXICON NextNClitic
	CNClitic ;
	PNClitic ;

LEXICON CNClitic
=CN:^hl	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON PNClitic
=PN:^t	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON SecPosClitic
@R.CAT.AUX@=EPIS:@R.CAT.AUX@^ima'a	SeriesIencl ;
@R.CAT.AUX@=EPIS:@R.CAT.AUX@^imaa	SeriesIencl ;
=EPIS:^ima'a	CNClitic ;
=EPIS:^imaa	CNClitic ;
=REPORT:^g_at	CNClitic ;

LEXICON SentFinalClitic
=YNQ:^aa	# ;
=QUDD:^ist	# ;
=QUDD:^is	# ;

! still need to test these e.g. with vowel hiatus interaction
